Texas statutes.
EDUCATION CODE

TITLE 2. PUBLIC EDUCATION

SUBTITLE D. EDUCATORS AND SCHOOL DISTRICT EMPLOYEES AND VOLUNTEERS

CHAPTER 23. SCHOOL CHAPLAINS

Sec. 23.001. SCHOOL CHAPLAINS. (a) A school district or open-enrollment charter school may employ or accept as a volunteer a chaplain to provide support, services, and programs for students as assigned by the board of trustees of the district or the governing body of the school. A chaplain employed or volunteering under this chapter is not required to be certified by the State Board for Educator Certification.

(b) A school district or open-enrollment charter school that employs or accepts as a volunteer a chaplain under this chapter shall ensure that the chaplain complies with the applicable requirements under Subchapter C, Chapter 22, before the chaplain begins employment or volunteering at the district or school.

(c) A school district or open-enrollment charter school may not employ or accept as a volunteer a chaplain who has been convicted of or placed on deferred adjudication community supervision for an offense for which a defendant is required to register as a sex offender under Chapter 62, Code of Criminal Procedure.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1142 (S.B. 763), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.